Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6202
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 77-6201 to 77-6204:

(1) Commissioned means the renewable energy generation facility or energy storage resource has been in commercial operation for at least twenty-four hours. A renewable energy generation facility is not in commercial operation unless the renewable energy generation facility is connected to the electrical grid or to the end user if the renewable energy generation facility is a customer-generator as defined in section 70-2002;

(2) Energy storage resource has the same meaning as in section 70-1001.01;

(3) Nameplate capacity means the capacity of (a) a renewable energy generation facility to generate electricity as measured in megawatts, including fractions of a megawatt, or (b) an energy storage resource to store electricity as measured in megawatts, including fractions of a megawatt. Nameplate capacity shall be determined based on the alternating current capacity of the facility or resource; and

(4) Renewable energy generation facility means (a) a facility that generates electricity using wind as the fuel source or (b) a facility that generates electricity using solar, biomass, or landfill gas as the fuel source if such facility was installed on or after January 1, 2016, and has a nameplate capacity of one hundred kilowatts or more.

Laws 2010, LB1048, § 13;

Laws 2015, LB424, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB76, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1010, § 14.
July 18, 2026